Tennessee, session 114, SB0572.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 16-15-501(d)(1), is amended by
deleting "twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000)" and substituting "fifty thousand dollars
($50,000)".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0572
001194
- 1 -